Hawaii statutes.
part XVII. TRANSITION PROVISIONS

Note

Part renumbered by L 2002, c 130, §37.

§414D-321 Application to existing domestic
corporations. This chapter applies to all domestic corporations in
existence on July 1, 2002, that were incorporated under any general statute of
this State providing for incorporation of nonprofit corporations. [L 2001, c
105, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 130, §71]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next